Hawaii statutes.
[§340E-41] Compliance. The failure or
inability of any public water system to receive funds under this part or any
other loan or grant program, or any delay in obtaining the funds, shall not
alter the obligation of the public water system to comply in a timely manner
with all applicable requirements of this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter. [L 1997, c 218, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next